Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.290

Fiscal responsibilities of state officers and employees—Prohibitions relative to appropriations and expenditures.

No state officer or employee shall intentionally or negligently: Over-expend or over-encumber any appropriation made by law; fail to properly account for any expenditures by fund, program, or fiscal period; or expend funds contrary to the terms, limits, or conditions of any appropriation made by law.

[ 1981 c 270 s 13; 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 270: See notes following RCW 43.88.010.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 320: See note following RCW 43.88.280.